Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1416
Death of plaintiff; right of defendant to compel revivor.

At any term of the court succeeding the death of the plaintiff, while the action remains on the trial docket, the defendant, having given to the plaintiff's proper representatives in whose names the action might be revived ten days' notice of the application therefor, may have an order to strike the action from the trial docket and for costs against the estate of the plaintiff, unless the action is forthwith revived.

R.S.1867, Code § 469, p. 471;

R.S.1913, § 8037;

C.S.1922, § 8978;

C.S.1929, § 20-1416;

R.S.1943, § 25-1416;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 23.